src/ateq-kal-morph.txt
! ===================== !
! Propriernes morfologi !
! ===================== !

! Navnelexikon er i ateq-kal-lex.txt.

LEXICON attribut_til_prop
+PROP+ATTR:%>	K ;

LEXICON Z1geoSZ !Igaliku og Narsaq
! :- Z1geoSZ-suf ;   !SUB
    Z1geoSZ-suf ;   !SUB
LEXICON Z1geoSZ-suf !SUB
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg:	K ; !Z1geoSZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%TRUNCp	K ; !Z1geoSZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>%TRUNCmut	TrmVb ; !Z1geoSZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmit	AblVb ; !Z1geoSZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmiit	K ; !Z1geoSZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCminngaaniit	K ; !Z1geoSZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>%TRUNCmi	LokVb ; !Z1geoSZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%TRUNCtut	K ; !Z1geoSZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>%TRUNCmik	K ; !Z1geoSZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z1geoSZ

LEXICON Z1geoPZ !Paamiut
+N+Prop+Abs+Pl:%>%TRUNCt	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Pl:%>%TRUNCt	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Pl:%>%TRUNCnut	TrmVb ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCnit	AblVb ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCniit	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Pl:%>%TRUNCni	LokVb ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl:%>%TRUNCtut	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Pl:%>%TRUNCnik	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Via+Pl:%>%TRUNCtigut	ViaVb ; !Z1geoPZ

LEXICON Z1geo_lukPZ !Iqaluit
+N+Prop+Abs+Pl:%>%TRUNCit	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Pl:%>%TRUNCit	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Pl:%>%TRUNCnnut	TrmVb ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCnnit	AblVb ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCnniit	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Pl:%>%TRUNCnni	LokVb ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl:%>%TRUNCttut	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Pl:%>%TRUNCnnik	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+N+Prop+Via+Pl:%>%TRUNCtigut	ViaVb ; !Z1geoPZ

LEXICON Z1geo_nnguaqPZ !Kangilinnguit NY 20100319 (PL)
+N+Prop+Abs+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCit	K_plur ; !Z1geo_nnguaqPZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCit	K_plur ; !Z1geo_nnguaqPZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Pl:%>%TRUNCnut	TrmVb ; !Z1geo_nnguaqPZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCnit	AblVb ; !Z1geo_nnguaqPZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCniit	K_plur ; !Z1geo_nnguaqPZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Pl:%>%TRUNCni	LokVb ; !Z1geo_nnguaqPZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl:%>%TRUNCtut	K_plur ; !Z1geo_nnguaqPZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Pl:%>%TRUNCnik	K_plur ; !Z1geo_nnguaqPZ
+N+Prop+Via+Pl:%>%TRUNCtigut	ViaVb ; !Z1geo_nnguaqPZ

LEXICON Z1geo_nnguaqZ !Quassunnguaq NY 20100410 (PL)
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg:	K ; !Z1geo_nnguaqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCup	K ; !Z1geo_nnguaqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>%TRUNCmut	TrmVb ; !Z1geo_nnguaqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmit	AblVb ; !Z1geo_nnguaqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmiit	K ; !Z1geo_nnguaqZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>%TRUNCmi	LokVb ; !Z1geo_nnguaqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%TRUNCtut	K ; !Z1geo_nnguaqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>%TRUNCmik	K ; !Z1geo_nnguaqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z1geo_nnguaqZ

LEXICON Z1geo+ssPZ !Ilulissat
+N+Prop+Abs+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssat	K_plur ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssat	K_plur ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssanut	TrmVb ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssanit	AblVb ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssaniit	K_plur ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssani	LokVb ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssatut	K_plur ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssanik	K_plur ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+N+Prop+Via+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1geo+ssPZ

LEXICON Z1geo_oqsZ !Finland
! :- Z1geo_oqsZ-suf ;    !SUB
    Z1geo_oqsZ-suf ;    !SUB
LEXICON Z1geo_oqsZ-suf  !SUB
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg:%EPENT	K ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>ip	K ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>imut	TrmVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>imit	AblVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>imiit	K ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>imi	LokVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>itut	K ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>imik	K ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg:%>ikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ

LEXICON Z1geo_oqseZ !Thule
! :- Z1geo_oqseZ-suf ;   !SUB
    Z1geo_oqseZ-suf ;   !SUB
LEXICON Z1geo_oqseZ-suf !SUB
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg:%>e	K ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>ip	K ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>imut	TrmVb ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>imit	AblVb ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>imiit	K ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>imi	LokVb ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>itut	K ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>imik	K ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg:%>ikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1geo_oqseZ


LEXICON Z2-geoSZ !Nuuk
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg:	K ; !Z2-geoSZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%TRUNCup	K ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>mut	TrmVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>mit	AblVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>miit	K ; !Z2-geoSZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>mi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>tut	K ; !Z2-geoSZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>mik	K ; !Z2-geoSZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z2-geoSZ

LEXICON Z2geo_aqSZ !Nuussuaq
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg:	K ; !Z2aqSZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCup	K ; !Z2geo_aqSZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>mut	TrmVb ; !Z2geo_aqSZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>mit	AblVb ; !Z2geo_aqSZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>miit	K ; !Z2geo_aqSZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>mi	LokVb ; !Z2geo_aqSZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>tut	K ; !Z2geo_aqSZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>mik	K ; !Z2geo_aqSZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z2geo_aqSZ


LEXICON Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Attr: # ; !Z1ateqSZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg:	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutiga	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaa	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutini	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCuterput	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtarput	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutersi	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtarsi	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaat	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaat	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutertik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abs+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtartik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%TRUNCp	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutima	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutivit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaata	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimi	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitta	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatta	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissi	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassi	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaata	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaata	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Rel+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtamik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>%TRUNCmut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaannut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Trm+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminnut	TrmVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassinnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaannit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminnit	AblVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmiit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaaniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminiit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassinniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaanniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaanniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Abl+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminniit	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>%TRUNCmi	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaani	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimini	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinni	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassinni	LokVb ;
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaanni	LokVb ;
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaanni	LokVb ; 
+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminni	LokVb ; 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Lok+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminni	LokVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%TRUNCtut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%TRUNCtuut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutittut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutittut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaatut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimisut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsitut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsitut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissitut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassitut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaattut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaattut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimittut	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtamittut	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>%TRUNCmik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaanik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutiminik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCtassinnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaannik	K ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaannik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutiminnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Ins+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaminnik	K ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Sg:%>%TRUNCutikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Sg:%>%TRUNCutikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaagut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Sg:%>%TRUNCutaatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Sg:%>%TRUNCutimigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCutitsigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+1Pl:%>%TRUNCrtatsigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCutissigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ 
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+2Pl:%>%TRUNCrtassigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCutaatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+3Pl:%>%TRUNCrtaatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCutimikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
+TAQ+N+Prop+Via+Sg+4Pl:%>%TRUNCrtamikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1ateqZ
